Louisiana, session 2026, SB304.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3125.1 and Chapter 25-B of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 17:3171 through 3176, are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§3125.1. Accreditation; powers of the Board of Regents
The Board of Regents shall have the power to set policy regarding the
accreditation of all public postsecondary institutions, as provided in Chapter
25-B of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
* * *
CHAPTER 25-B. ACCREDITATION OF
PUBLIC POST SECONDARY INSTITUTIONS
§3171. Application
Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, this Chapter shall
govern the accreditation of all public postsecondary institutions.
§3172. Definitions
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 304 ENROLLED
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) "Board of Regents" means the coordinating body for public
postsecondary education that oversees policies, budgets, academic program
approval, and facility planning for all Louisiana universities, community
colleges, and technical schools, pursuant to Article VIII, Section 5 of the
Constitution of Louisiana and R.S. 17:3121.
(2) "Management board" means a governing board of a public
postsecondary education institution that is responsible for supervising the
day-to-day operations of such institutions under the overall jurisdictional
planning and budgetary authority of the Louisiana Board of Regents. Article
VIII of the Constitution of Louisiana provides that the management boards are
the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State University and Agricultural and
Mechanical College, the Board of Supervisors for the University of Louisiana
System, the Board of Supervisors of Southern University and Agricultural and
Mechanical College, and the Board of Supervisors of Community and Technical
Colleges.
(3) "Public postsecondary institution" or "institution" means a public
college or university that is under the jurisdiction of a management board for
postsecondary education created by or under authority of the Constitution of
Louisiana.
§3173. Powers of the Board of Regents; coordination with management boards
A. In coordination with each management board of a public
postsecondary institution, the Board of Regents shall have the power to set
policy regarding each of the following:
(1) Accreditation of public postsecondary institutions.
(2) Specialized accreditation of any individual program or unit at a
public postsecondary institution where such accreditation is required.
B. The Board of Regents shall adopt policies to allow a public
postsecondary institution, subject to the approval of the institution's
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 304 ENROLLED
management board, to seek a new institutional accreditor from a list of
accreditors recognized by the United States Department of Education or to seek
a new specialized accreditor from a list of specialized accreditors maintained by
the Board of Regents.
C. The Board of Regents, in coordination with the management boards,
shall develop a process of changing an institutional accreditor in a manner that
ensures that a public postsecondary institution remains accredited at all times
by an accreditor recognized by the United States Department of Education.
D. With respect to specialized accreditation of an individual program or
unit, the Board of Regents shall do all of the following:
(1) Identify a list of units, programs, and professional schools that
require specialized accreditation and a corresponding list of recognized
accreditors.
(2) Adopt policies, in coordination with the management boards, to
ensure that each program or unit requiring specialized accreditation remains
accredited at all times by an accreditor from the list of accreditors maintained
by the Board of Regents.
§3174. Process for accreditation; applications; accreditors
A. A public postsecondary institution may seek a new accreditor for the
institution or for a specialized program or unit so long as the selection of an
accreditor and the process of seeking accreditation complies with this Chapter.
B. If a public postsecondary institution seeks a new accreditor, the
institution shall apply for approval with the institution's management board.
C. The public postsecondary institution shall seek an accreditor that
prioritizes all of the following:
(1) Promotes credential success and workforce outcomes.
(2) Promotes educational quality and affordability.
(3) Promotes financial stability of the public postsecondary institutions.
(4) Ensures appropriate accountability through a rigorous annual review
of the faculty.
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 304 ENROLLED
D. The management board may not approve an accreditor unless the
accreditor has agreed, in writing, that the accreditor will not condition the
initial accreditation and will not condition any continued accreditation upon
any violation of law, as prohibited in R.S. 17:3176.
§3175. Management boards of public postsecondary institutions
A. If a public postsecondary institution applies for a new accreditor, as
provided in R.S. 17:3174, the management board shall do all of the following:
(1) Review the institution's application and determine if the proposed
accreditor meets the standards and requirements set forth in this Chapter.
(2) Determine if the application for a new accreditor complies with the
policies set forth by the Board of Regents, as provided in R.S. 17:3173.
B. With respect to a public postsecondary institution's accreditor or any
application for a new accreditor, the management board shall, in coordination
with the Board of Regents, do all of the following:
(1) Ensure that each public postsecondary institution that is under the
management board's jurisdiction shall post on the institution's website the
status of its accreditation and other documentation that the management board
deems relevant that has been submitted to the accreditor to gain or maintain
accreditation.
(2) Specify the manner and frequency that the institution is to notify or
update the public on the progress of reaccreditation with the same accreditor
or the process of accreditation with a new accreditor through the institution's
website.
§3176. Prohibited accreditors
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no
accreditor may be chosen that conditions accreditation upon any violation of the
Constitution of Louisiana or any state law.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute, pursuant to its statutory authority, is
hereby directed to delete "Southern Association of Colleges and Schools Commission on
Colleges" and replace with "accreditor recognized by the United States Department of
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 304 ENROLLED
Education" in R.S. 17:3164, 3223, 3351.17, and 5029 and in any other Section in Title 17
or in any other Section or Code of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.